Washington statutes.
RCW 2.06.020

Divisions—Locations—Judges enumerated—Districts.

The court shall have three divisions, one of which shall be headquartered in Seattle, one of which shall be headquartered in Spokane, and one of which shall be headquartered in Tacoma:

(1) The first division shall have twelve judges from three districts, as follows:

(a) District 1 shall consist of King county and shall have eight judges;

(b) District 2 shall consist of Snohomish county and shall have two judges; and

(c) District 3 shall consist of Island, San Juan, Skagit, and Whatcom counties and shall have two judges.

(2) The second division shall have eight judges from the following districts:

(a) District 1 shall consist of Pierce county and shall have three judges;

(b) District 2 shall consist of Clallam, Grays Harbor, Jefferson, Kitsap, Mason, and Thurston counties and shall have three judges;

(c) District 3 shall consist of Clark, Cowlitz, Lewis, Pacific, Skamania, and Wahkiakum counties and shall have two judges.

(3) The third division shall have five judges from the following districts:

(a) District 1 shall consist of Ferry, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pend Oreille, Spokane, and Stevens counties and shall have two judges;

(b) District 2 shall consist of Adams, Asotin, Benton, Columbia, Franklin, Garfield, Grant, Walla Walla, and Whitman counties and shall have one judge;

(c) District 3 shall consist of Chelan, Douglas, Kittitas, Klickitat, and Yakima counties and shall have two judges.

[ 2009 c 77 s 1; 1999 c 75 s 1; 1993 c 420 s 1; 1989 c 328 s 10; 1977 ex.s. c 49 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 221 s 2.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. RAP 4.1(b).

Judicial position contingent on funding—2009 c 77: "The judicial position created by *section 1, chapter 77, Laws of 2009 shall become effective only if that position is specifically funded and is referenced by division and district in an omnibus appropriations act." [ 2009 c 77 s 2.]

*Reviser's note: The judicial position created by section 1, chapter 77, Laws of 2009 was not referenced in a 2009 omnibus appropriations act.

Effective date—1993 c 420: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [May 15, 1993]." [ 1993 c 420 s 3.]

Intent—1989 c 328: See note following RCW 2.08.061.

Appointments to positions created by the amendment to this section by 1977 ex.s. c 49 s 1: RCW 2.06.075.